Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.050

Manager—Secretary-treasurer—Treasurer's bond.

The commission shall elect a manager, who is not a member, and fix his or her compensation; and shall appoint a secretary-treasurer, who shall sign all vouchers and receipts for all moneys received by the commission. The treasurer shall file with the commission a fidelity bond in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state, in favor of the state and the commission, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties and strict accounting of all funds to the commission.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6058; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 3; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.050. Prior: (i) 1939 c 219 s 5; RRS s 6266-5. (ii) 1939 c 219 s 6; RRS s 6266-6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 238: See note following RCW 15.44.010.